Hawaii, session 2026, SB2461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that it is beneficial for voters in the State to have as much information as possible about a candidate running for office, including a candidate's position on pertinent issues. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the office of elections to: (1)  Prepare a questionnaire of certain issues to which a candidate may respond; and (2)  Publish a candidate's responses to the questionnaire (A)  On the office's website; and (B)  In the digital voter information guide. SECTION 2.  Chapter 11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VIII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§11-     Candidate questionnaire; requirements; publication of candidate responses. (a)  Beginning with the 2028 primary election, before each election cycle, the office of elections shall: (1)  Prepare a candidate questionnaire comprising not more than ten questions; and (2)  Issue the candidate questionnaire to each candidate running for a public office within days from the date that a candidate files their nomination papers. (b)  The questions shall be based on: (1)  Major recurring budget items funded by the State within the past ten years; (2)  Significant bills introduced in the two most recent regular legislative sessions; (3)  Tax policy, including a comparison of the State's overall tax burden, income tax rates, general excise tax, corporate taxes, and taxes on essentials in comparison to other states; and (4)  A comparison of the State's infrastructure and public schools rank to those of other states with respect to the amount that the State taxes individuals per capita. (c)  A candidate who chooses to respond to any question on the candidate questionnaire shall provide a written response to the office of elections; provided that a written response to a question based on subparagraphs b(3) or (4) shall describe the candidate's position on the reform or maintenance of: (1)  The State's tax code; and (2)  The areas described in paragraph b(4). (d)  The office of elections shall publish a candidate's written responses, if any: (1)  On its website; and (2)  In the digital voter information guide, no later than eighteen days before the day of the primary election." SECTION 3.  Section 11-122, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The digital voter information guide shall include: (1)  A photograph and short statement of less than one hundred fifty words for each candidate running for public office, to be prepared by the candidate; provided that the office of elections may uniformly limit the number of words for the candidate statement by applicable public office; (2)  The written responses to the candidate questionnaire of each candidate, if any, pursuant to section 11-   ; [(2)] (3)  The explanation drafted by the department of the attorney general of each state constitutional amendment that will be proposed to voters in the next general election pursuant to section 11-118.5(b); provided that the department of the attorney general shall transmit the materials required by this paragraph to the office of elections no later than seventy-five days before the general election; [(3)] (4)  A clear and concise explanation, drafted by the appropriate county corporation counsel, for each proposed county charter amendment, proposed initiative, and proposed referendum issue; provided that the respective corporation counsel shall: (A)  Translate the explanation into Olelo Hawaii and any other languages required under the federal Voting Rights Act, as specified by the office of elections; and (B)  Transmit the materials required by this paragraph to the office of elections no later than seventy‑five days before the general election; and [(4)] (5)  Information regarding mailing deadlines, places of deposit locations, same day voter registration, accessible voting locations, and opening hours of voter service centers." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2027. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________